public/strategies/hypha.txt
                                YYYBY3 retch GGGGG4
                   YBYYB2 shirt GGGGG3
                   YGBBB2 month BGBGG3 booth GGGGG4
                                BGBYG3 botch GGGGG4
                                BGYYG3 notch GGGGG4
                                GGBGG3 mouth GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   YGBYB2 sooth GGBGG3 south GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   YGGBB2 worth BGGGG3 forth BGGGG4 north GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   YYBBB2 cloth BBGGG3 quoth GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   YYBGB2 ghost GGGGG3
                   YYBYB2 shoot GGGBG3 shout GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                                GYGBY3 sloth GGGGG4
                   YYBYY2 ethos GGGGG3
                   YYYBB2 broth BGGGG3 froth GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   YYYBY2 other GGGGG3
                   YYYYB2 short GGGGG3
      YBBBG1 china BGBBG2 theta GGGGG3
                   GGGGG2
      YBBBY1 crest BBBBB2 khaki BYYBB3 laugh GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   BBBBY2 faith BYBGG3 loath GGGGG4
                                BYBYY3 thank GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   BBBGB2 swoln GBBBB3 smash GGGGG4
                                GBBYB3 slash GGGGG4
                                GGBBB3 swash GGGGG4
                                YBBBB3 quash GGGGG4
                                YBBBY3 gnash GGGGG4
                                YBBYB3 flash GGGGG4
                                YGBBB3 awash GGGGG4
                   BBBGY2 stash GGGGG3
                   BBBYB2 shall GGGBB3 shank GGGGG4
                                GGGBG3 shawl GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                                GGYBG3 shoal GGGGG4
                   BBBYG2 shaft GGGBG3 shalt GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   BBBYY2 swath GGGGG3
                   BBGBB2 ahead GGGGG3
                   BBGBG2 wheat GGGGG3
                   BBYBB2 whale GGGGG3
                   BBYBY2 death GGGGG3
                   BBYGB2 leash GGGGG3
                   BBYYB2 delve BBBBG3 shake GGGBG4 shame GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BBBGG3 shave GGGGG4
                                BBYBG3 shale GGGGG4
                                BYBBB3 ashen GGGGG4
                                YBBBG3 shade GGGGG4
                   BGBBY2 wrath GGGGG3
                   BGBGB2 brash GGGGG3
                   BGBGY2 trash GGGGG3
                   BYBBB2 wharf BYYYB3 abhor GGGGG4
                                             YBYBY4 rajah GGGGG5
                                GGGGG3
                   BYBGB2 marsh GGGGG3
                   BYBYB2 shard GGGGB3 shark GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   BYGYB2 shear GGGGG3
                   BYYBB2 rehab GGGGG3
                   BYYBY2 earth GGGGG3
                   BYYYB2 share GGGGG3
                   GBBBB2 chalk GGGBB3 chaff GGGBB4 chain GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                                GYGBB3 coach GGGGG4
                   GBBBG2 chant GGGGG3
                   GBBBY2 catch GGGGG3
                   GBBGB2 chasm GGGGG3
                                GYGGB3 clash GGGGG4
                   GBBYB2 chaos GGGGG3
                   GBGBG2 cheat GGGGG3
                   GBYBB2 chafe GGGGG3
                   GBYGB2 chase GGGGG3
                   GGBGB2 crash GGGGG3
                   GYBBB2 chard GGGGB3 charm GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                                GGGYB3 chair GGGGG4
                   GYBBG2 chart GGGGG3
                   YBBBB2 whack GGGGG3
                   YBBBY2 album YBBBB3 watch GGGGG4
                                YBBBY3 match GGGGG4
                                YBYBB3 batch GGGGG4
                                YYBBB3 latch GGGGG4
                   YBBYB2 shack GGGGG3
                   YBYBB2 beach BGGGG3 leach GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   YBYBY2 teach GGGGG3
                   YYBBB2 march BGYGG3 ranch GGGGG4
                                BYYGG3 roach GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   YYYBB2 reach GGGGG3
      YBBYB1 thigh BGBBG2 shush GGGGG3
                   BGGBG2 which GGGGG3
                   GGGGG2
      YBGBB1 depth GGGGG2
      YBYBB1 count BBBBB2 sheep BGGBG3 whelp GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   BBGBB2 plush GGGGG3
                   BBGBY2 thump GGGGG3
                   BGBBB2 morph GGGGG3
                   BYBBB2 whoop GGGGG3
                   BYBBY2 photo GGGGG3
                   BYBGB2 phone GGGGG3
                   GBBBB2 chirp GGGGG3
                   GBGBB2 chump GGGGG3
                   YBBBB2 perch GGGGG3
                   YBBBY2 pitch GGGGG3
                   YBBYB2 pinch GGGGG3
                   YBYYB2 punch GGGGG3
                   YGBBB2 pooch GGBGG3 porch GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   YGGBB2 pouch GGGGG3
                   YYBBB2 epoch GGGGG3
      YBYBY1 peach GBYGG2 patch GGGGG3
                   GGGGG2
                   GYGBY2 phase GGGGG3
                   YBGBG2 graph GGGGG3
                   YBGBY2 sharp GGGGG3
                   YBGYY2 champ GGGGG3
                   YBYBG2 ralph GGGGG3
                   YBYBY2 aphid GGGGG3
                   YYGBY2 shape GGGGG3
                   YYYYY2 cheap GGGGG3
      YGBBB1 myrrh GGGGG2
      YGYBB1 lymph BGGGG2 nymph GGGGG3
                   GGGGG2
      YYBBB1 whiny BGBBG2 shyly GGGGG3
                   BGBBY2 rhyme BGGGG3 thyme GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   BGGGG2 shiny GGGGG3
                   BYBBY2 youth GGGGG3
                   GGGGG2
                   YGBBG2 showy GGGGG3
      YYBBY1 shady GGGBG2 shaky GGGGG3
                   GGGGG2
      YYYBB1 glyph BBYYY2 phony GGGGG3
                   GGGGG2
